Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-449
Permit to hunt antelope; regulation and limitation by commission; issuance; fees; violation; penalty.

(1) The commission may issue permits for hunting antelope and may adopt and promulgate separate and, when necessary, different rules and regulations therefor within the limitations prescribed in sections 37-447 and 37-452 for hunting deer. The commission may offer permits or combinations of permits at reduced rates for specific events or during specified timeframes.

(2) The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a nonrefundable application fee of not more than nine dollars for antelope permits in those management units awarded on the basis of a random drawing. The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not more than fifty dollars for residents and not less than three hundred sixty-nine dollars and not more than four hundred eighty dollars for nonresidents for each permit issued under this section except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not more than twenty-four dollars for residents and not more than seventy-two dollars for nonresidents for the issuance of a preference point, in addition to any application fee. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for issuing a preference point.

(3) The provisions for the distribution of deer permits and the authority of the commission to determine eligibility of applicants for permits as described in sections 37-447 and 37-452 shall also apply to the distribution of antelope permits.

(4) The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not more than twenty-five dollars for residents and not more than forty-five dollars for nonresidents for a youth antelope permit.

(5) Any person violating the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and shall be fined at least one hundred dollars upon conviction.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 159;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 16;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 12;

Laws 2023, LB565, § 26;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 11.
July 18, 2026